Massachusetts, session 194th, S627.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 132B of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following definitions:-
“Glyphosate” or “glyphosate herbicides” includes all herbicides that contain glyphosate
as one of the active ingredients and tank mixes of herbicides containing glyphosate as one of the
active ingredients.”
“Public lands” for the purpose of this bill shall mean state parks, playgrounds, school
buildings, highway medians owned and maintained by the Commonwealth, and buildings owned
and operated by the State.
of 3

SECTION 2. Chapter 132B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 17. No person shall:
(1) Use any pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its label;
(2) Use, store, transport, or discard any pesticide or pesticide container in any manner
which would have unreasonable adverse effects on the environment or public health;
(3) Use or apply restricted use pesticides unless the person is a certified pesticide
applicator or under the direct supervision of a certified pesticide applicator with a valid
certificate issued; provided that it shall be prohibited to use or apply a restricted use pesticide for
structural pest control uses for a fee or trading of services, unless the user or applicator is a pest
control operator or is employed by a pest control operator licensed under chapter 460J;
(4) Use or apply pesticides in any manner that has been suspended, canceled, or
restricted;
(5) Falsify any record or report required to be made or maintained by rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter;
(6) Fill with water, through a hose, pipe, or other similar transmission system, any tank,
implement, apparatus, or equipment used to disperse pesticides, unless the tank, implement,
apparatus, equipment, hose, pipe, or other similar transmission system is equipped with an air
gap or a reduced-pressure principle backflow device;
(7) After December 31, 2026, no person shall apply any glyphosate herbicide, on any
public lands owned or maintained by the Commonwealth without a:
of 3

(A) License issued by the State or any agency of the federal government to conduct
glyphosate research; or
(B) Permit issued by the State to apply any glyphosate herbicide because:
(i) The situation poses an immediate threat to human health and the environment; and
(ii) There is no viable alternative to the use of the proposed glyphosate herbicide."
SECTION 3. The department of food and agriculture shall adopt regulations within 1
year after the effective date of this act.
of 3